Utah statutes.
48-2a-906 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Cancellation of registration.

A foreign limited partnership may cancel its registration by filing with the division a certificate of cancellation signed under penalty of perjury by a general partner.  A cancellation does not terminate the authority of the director of the division to accept service of process on the foreign limited partnership with respect to claims for relief and causes of action against the foreign limited partnership arising before the cancellation.



Amended by Chapter 189, 1991 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

